src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-toohad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - toohâđ: # checked

    toohâđ+V+Inf: toohâđ
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: [tohhuđ, toohuđ]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tohhuum
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tohhuuh
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tahhoo
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tahhojeen
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tohhuuvettee
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [tohhuv, toohuv]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [tohhup, toohup]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tohhuuvetteđ
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tahhojeh
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tahhojim
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tahhojih
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tohhui, toohui]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [tohhuim, toohuim]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [tohhuid, toohuid]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [tohhuin, toohuin]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [tohhuim, toohuim]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tohhuid, toohuid]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tahhojii
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tohhuuččim
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: tohhuuččih
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tohhuuččij
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: tohhuuččáim
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: tohhuuččáid
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: tohhuuččáin
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: tohhuuččijm
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: tohhuuččijd
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: tohhuuččii
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tohhuužeem
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: tohhuužeeh
##    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tohhuš
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tohhuužeen
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: tohhušvettee
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tohhuužává
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tohhuužep
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: tohhušvetteđ
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tohhuužeh
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tohhuu
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: [tohhum, toohum]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: tohhuuččii
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tohhuužii
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [tahhojeijee, tahhojijjee]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: [tohhum, toohum]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: [tohhum, toohum]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: tohhuumin
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: tohhuumist
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: tohhuumân
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: tohhuudijn
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: tohhuuhánnáá
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâdâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tovâdah
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toovâd
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tovâdeen
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: toovâdvettee
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tovâdává
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tovâdeh
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toovâd
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tovâdim
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tovâdij
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tovâdii
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tovâdiččim
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tovâdičij
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tovâdižžeem
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tovâdiš
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toovâd
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tovâdâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tovâdižžii
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: tovâdâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: toovâdhánnáá
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: tovâdem
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: toovâdmân
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: toovâdmin
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: toovâdmist
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: toovâddijn
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg1: toovâddijnân
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg2: toovâddijnâd
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg3: toovâddijnis
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: toovâddijn
    toohâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâstâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâttâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâškuáđám
